Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-913
Surplus and excess property program; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a single state agency shall, in cooperation with other state agencies and political subdivisions, carry out the provisions of Public Law 94-519.

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 1.